Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 10
INCENTIVES FOR SELF-SUFFICIENCY

26-2-1001. Short title.

This part 10 shall be known and may be cited as the "Individual Development Account Act".

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part added, p. 1469, § 1, effective May 31.

26-2-1002. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that:

The unrealized and lost human resource potential of low-income and working-poor individuals of this state results in an overall loss to the potential of the entire state;

It is in the best interests of all Coloradans to structure incentives in a way that will result in a greater likelihood that low-income and working-poor individuals will attain self-sufficiency;

It is in the best interests of all Coloradans to concentrate appropriate assets and investments on low-income and working-poor individuals and in low-income and working-poor neighborhoods and communities in order to allow low-income individuals, neighborhoods, and communities to benefit from the developments achieved through the growth in assets and investments;

Achieving self-sufficiency and assessing economic opportunity for low-income and working-poor individuals can be addressed through public policy that invests in asset accumulation and is supported by private sector philanthropy;

Providing a structured savings situation for low-income and working-poor individuals enhances such individuals' chances of fulfilling major life goals and opportunities and incorporates such individuals into the economic mainstream; and

Such self-sufficiency may, in turn, result in fewer people needing to seek public assistance.

Therefore, the general assembly hereby authorizes the implementation of an individual development account program to provide incentives and motivation for low-income and working-poor individuals and families to develop and concentrate assets and investments for use by such individuals who are striving for self-sufficiency and need a jump-start for economic opportunity.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part added, p. 1469, § 1, effective May 31.

26-2-1003. Definitions.

As used in this part 10, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Charitable donor" means a person who contributes to a sponsoring organization for the purposes of the IDA program.

"Financial institution" means an organization that is federally insured and is authorized to do business under state or federal laws relating to financial institutions and includes a bank, trust company, savings bank, building and loan association, savings and loan company or association, and credit union.

"Individual development account" means a contract of deposit between a depositor and a financial institution selected by a sponsoring organization.

"Program" or "IDA program" means the individual development account program established pursuant to this part 10.

"Service provider" means an institution of higher education; a provider of occupational or career and technical education; a trade school; a bank, savings and loan, or other mortgage lender; a title company; or the lessor or vendor of any office supplies, office equipment, retail space or office space or other business space, or such other provider of goods or services to be used for the commencement of a business.

"Sponsoring organization" means a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under section 501 (c)(3) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, that participates in IDA programs, and that verifies authorized use of individual development accounts.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part added, p. 1470, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2017:

(5) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1410, § 97, effective May 25.

26-2-1004. Individual development account program - rules.

The IDA program shall provide that eligible individuals who establish individual development accounts, as set forth in section 26-2-1005, shall receive the benefit of matching moneys payable directly to the service provider at the time of the eligible individual's expenditure of the moneys in his or her individual development account for any of the following purposes:

Securing postsecondary education, including but not limited to community college courses, courses at a four-year college or university, or post-college, graduate courses for either the individual or the individual's dependent;

Securing postsecondary occupational training, including but not limited to vocational or trade school training for either the individual or the individual's dependent;

Purchasing a home for the first time, either individually or with another family member; or

Business capitalization.

In addition to the purposes set forth in subsection (1) of this section, an eligible individual may expend up to ten percent of the total moneys from his or her individual development account for supportive counseling, mentoring, tutoring, or other related services as provided by sponsoring organizations and as approved by such individual development account holders.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part added, p. 1471, § 1, effective May 31.

26-2-1005. Eligibility for participation in the individual development account program.

Sponsoring organizations that elect to participate in the program shall recruit individuals or households to participate in the IDA program and shall determine the eligibility of prospective participants based upon the criteria set forth in this subsection (1). All individuals within one family or a single individual shall be eligible to be selected for participation in the IDA program if the individual or household meets the following requirements:

The individual's or household's income may not exceed two hundred percent of the federal poverty line when applied to the savings goals of postsecondary education or business capitalization. The individual's or household's income may not exceed eighty percent of the area median income when applied to the savings goal of home ownership.

An individual within a household has entered into an individual development account agreement with a sponsoring organization.

An individual within a household has established an individual development account with a financial institution selected by the sponsoring organization and has made a commitment, as set forth in this section, to save and match philanthropic sources of moneys that are available to match the individual or household contributions to the individual development account. The individual development account shall accrue interest.

The individual or the household may only open one individual development account.

The individual submitting the application is a citizen of the United States and is a legal resident of the state.

All of the following duties shall be undertaken by one or more sponsoring organizations:

To determine the eligibility of individuals or households to participate in the IDA program;

To counsel such individuals and households about the IDA program;

To conduct orientations with individuals or households on the philosophy underlying the IDA program and the general requirements of the program;

To facilitate the opening of individual development accounts with participating financial institutions;

To provide credit counseling, budgeting, and financial management training to the program participants;

To jointly develop specific goals and performance criteria with each program participant;

To set appropriate matching ratios of philanthropic moneys to contributions made by program participants;

Repealed.

To raise contributions for the IDA program.

The program participant may withdraw contributions made by the participant for uses other than those uses authorized under this program one time but, upon the second such action, shall be terminated from the IDA program. A participant who has been terminated from the IDA program may withdraw all moneys that the participant contributed to the account along with any interest accrued on the participant's contribution.

The maximum amount of moneys in an individual development account that may be matched by a charitable donor is ten thousand dollars. The individual may deposit an amount greater than ten thousand dollars, but funds in excess of ten thousand dollars are subject to any applicable state and federal income taxes, and shall not be matched by a charitable donor. Only one account per family may be established in the IDA program; except that every member of the family may utilize the account.

Nothing in this part 10 shall be construed to create an entitlement to matching moneys. The number of individuals who may receive disbursement of matching philanthropic moneys by sponsoring organizations pursuant to the IDA program shall necessarily be limited by the amount of philanthropic moneys available in any given year for such purpose.

and (7) Repealed.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part added, p. 1471, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2001:

(1)(e) added and (4) and (6) amended, p. 412, §§ 1, 2, effective April 19.

L. 2010:

(2)(h), (6), and (7) repealed, (SB 10-212), ch. 412, p. 2032, § 1, effective July 1; (1)(a) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2116, § 156, effective August 11.